Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1655
Rural Road Improvement District Act, how cited.

Sections 39-1638 to 39-1655 shall be known and may be cited as the Rural Road Improvement District Act.

Laws 1963, c. 213, § 18, p. 686;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 66.
July 18, 2026